en: Chocolate-Vanilla ice cream cones
fi: Suklaa-vanilja jäätelötuutit
fr: Cônes chocolat vanille, Cônes vanille chocolat
hr: Kornete sladoleda čokolada-vanilija
lt: Šokolado-vanilės ledai vafliniame ragelyje
nl: Chocolade-vanille ijshoorntjes

en: Strawberry-Vanilla ice cream cones
fi: Mansikka-vanilja jäätelötuutit
fr: Cônes vanille fraise, Cônes fraise vanille
hr: Korneti sladoleda jagoda-vanilija
lt: Braškių-vanilės ledai vafliniame ragelyje
nl: Aardbeien-vanille ijshoorntjes

en: Coffee-Vanilla ice cream cones
fr: Cônes vanille café, Cônes café vanille
hr: Kornete sladoleda kava-vanilija
lt: Kavos-vanilės ledai vafliniame ragelyje
nl: Koffie-vanille ijshoorntjes

en: Chocolate-Mint ice cream cones
fr: Cônes menthe chocolat, Cônes chocolat menthe
hr: Korneti sladoleda čokolada-menta
lt: Šokolado-mėtų ledai vafliniame ragelyje

en: Rum and raisins ice cream cones
fr: Cônes rhum et raisins

en: Mini ice cream cone
fr: Mini cône glacé, Mini cône de glace, Mini cône de crème glacée
hr: Mini kornet za sladoled
lt: Mini ledai vafliniame ragelyje

en: Ice cream tubs, Ice cream cups
ca: Terrines de gelat
de: Eisbecher, Eispackungen
es: Tarrinas y bloques de helado, Tarrinas de helado, Bloques de helado
fi: Jäätelöpurkit
fr: Crèmes glacées en pot, Crème glacée en pot, Glaces en pot
hr: Kadice za sladoled
it: Vaschette di gelato
ja: カップアイス
lt: Ledai indeliuose
nl: Roomijsbekers
sv: Glassbyttor, Glassbytta

en: Ice cream in a box
fi: Jäätelöpaketit
fr: Glace en bac, Crème glacée en bac, Bac de crème glacée
hr: Sladoled u kutiji
lt: Ledai dėžutėse

en: Luxury ice cream in a box
fr: Crème glacée gourmande en bac, Bac de glace, Bac de crème glacée gourmande
hr: Luksuzni sladoled u kutiji
lt: Prabangūs ledai dėžutėje

en: Luxury ice cream in a cup, Luxury ice cream cup
fr: Glace en pot, Crème glacée gourmande en pot, Pot de glace, Pot de crème glacée gourmande
hr: Luksuzni sladoled u šalici
lt: Prabangūs ledai indeliuose
nl: Luxe roomijs in een bak

en: Ice cream in individual cup, Individual ice cream cup
fr: Glace en pot individuel, Crème glacée en pot individuel
hr: Sladoled u pojedinačnoj čašici
lt: Ledai individualiame puodelyje

en: Ice cream cup for children
fr: Petit pot de glace pour enfant, Petit pot de crème glacée pour enfant
hr: Čaša za sladoled za djecu
lt: Ledų puodelis vaikams

en: Strawberry ice cream tubs
es: Tarrinas y bloques de helado de fresa, Tarrinas de helado de fresa, Bloques de helado de fresa
fr: Glaces à la fraise
hr: Kadice sladoleda od jagoda
lt: Braškiniai ledai indeliuose
nl: Aardbeienroomijs
sv: Jordgubbsgräddglassbyttor

en: Coconut ice cream tubs
de: Eisbecher Kokosnuss, Eispackung Kokosnuss
es: Tarrinas y bloques de helado de coco, Tarrinas de helado de coco, Bloques de helado de coco
fi: Kookosjäätelöpurkit
fr: Glaces à la noix de coco, glaces au coco
hr: Kadice sladoleda od kokosa
lt: Kokosiniai ledai indeliuose
nl: Kokosroomijs

en: Pistachio ice cream tubs
es: Tarrinas y bloques de helado de pistacho, Tarrinas de helado de pistacho, Bloques de helado de pistacho, helado de pistacho
fr: Glaces à la pistache
hr: Kadice sladoleda od pistacija
lt: Pistacijų ledai indeliuose
nl: Pistacheroomijs

en: Vanilla ice cream tubs
de: Eisbecher Vanille, Eispackung Vanille
es: Tarrinas y bloques de helado de vainilla, Tarrinas de helado de vainilla, Bloques de helado de vainilla, Helado de vainilla
fi: Vaniljajäätelöpurkit
fr: Glaces à la vanille
hr: Kadice sladoleda od vanilije
it: Vaschetta di gelato alla vaniglia
lt: Vaniliniai ledai indeliuose
nl: Vanille-roomijs
sv: Vaniljgräddglassbyttor

en: Coffee ice cream tubs
de: Eisbecher Kaffee, Eispackung Kaffee
es: Tarrinas y bloques de helado de café, Tarrinas de helado de café, Bloques de helado de café
fi: Kahvijäätelöpurkit
fr: Glaces au café
hr: Kadice za sladoled od kave
lt: Kavos ledai indeliuose
nl: Koffieroomijs

en: Chocolate ice cream tubs
de: Eisbecher Schokolade, Eispackung Schokolade
es: Tarrinas y bloques de helado de chocolate, Tarrinas de helado de chocolate, Bloques de helado de chocolate
fi: Suklaajäätelöpurkit
fr: Glaces au chocolat
hr: Kadice za sladoled od čokolade
it: Vaschette di gelato al cioccolato
lt: Šokoladiniai ledai indeliuose
nl: Chocolade-roomijs

en: Nougat ice cream tubs
es: Tarrinas y bloques de helado de turrón, Tarrinas de helado de turrón, Bloques de helado de turrón, helado de turrón
fr: Glaces au nougat
hr: Kadice sladoleda od nugata
lt: Nugos ledai indeliuose
nl: Nougatroomijs

en: Chestnut ice cream tubs, chestnut ice creams
fr: Glaces aux marrons, Glaces à la crème de marrons
hr: Kadice sladoleda od kestena
lt: Kaštonų ledai indeliuose